California, session 20252026, AB2708.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 890 of the Penal Code is amended to read:890. Unless a higher fee or rate of mileage is otherwise provided by statute or county or city and county ordinance, the fees for grand jurors are fifteen dollars ($15) a per day for each day’s attendance as a grand juror, and the mileage reimbursement applicable to county employees for each mile actually traveled in attending court as a grand juror.